Illinois, session 104th, HB4360.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)7    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; school counselor 8stipend program. To provide for the expeditious and timely 9implementation of Section 9.45 of the Board of Higher 10Education Act, emergency rules implementing Section 9.45 of 11the Board of Higher Education Act may be adopted in accordance 12with Section 5-45 by the Board of Higher Education. The 13adoption of emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and 14this Section is deemed to be necessary for the public 15interest, safety, and welfare.16    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 17of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 18    Section 10. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended 19by adding Section 9.45 as follows: 20    (110 ILCS 205/9.45 new)21    Sec. 9.45. School counselor stipend program.  HB4360- 2 -LRB104 12580 AAS 23145 b1    (a) As used in this Section:2    "Educator preparation program" means an approved educator 3preparation program offered by a recognized school or 4institution under Article 21B of the School Code.5    "Eligible cooperating school counselor" means an 6individual who (i) is a school counselor as defined in Section 710-22.24a of the School Code or holds a Professional Educator 8License with a school support personnel endorsement in the 9area of school counselor under Section 21B-25 of the School 10Code and (ii) is matched with an eligible student.11    "Eligible student" means a student who is enrolled in an 12educator preparation program, who is maintaining satisfactory 13academic progress, who intends to work as a school counselor 14in this State, who is placed in a school counselor internship, 15and who is not contracted as the school counselor of record for 16the school counseling placement.17    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Board shall create a 18school counselor stipend program to alleviate the financial 19burden of becoming a school counselor, to encourage students 20to pursue careers as school counselors to alleviate this 21State's school counselor shortage, and to encourage school 22counselors to be matched with school counselor interns.23    (c) An educator preparation program shall notify the Board 24of all eligible students and eligible cooperating school 25counselors who qualify for the stipend program.26    (d) Under the stipend program and subject to available   HB4360- 3 -LRB104 12580 AAS 23145 b1appropriations, the Board shall disburse to each educator 2preparation program funds to distribute to each eligible 3student a stipend of $5,000 per semester for up to 2 4consecutive semesters, plus additional funds to pay the direct 5costs of operating the stipend program.6    (e) If there is a surplus appropriated in a fiscal year for 7the stipend program, then the Board shall increase the amount 8disbursed to each educator preparation program by the same 9percentage that the surplus bears to the amount required to 10fully fund the total number of eligible students who qualify 11for the stipend program that fiscal year. An educator 12preparation program shall increase the stipend amount 13distributed to each eligible student in proportion to the 14surplus.15    (f) If the amount appropriated in a fiscal year for the 16stipend program is insufficient to fully fund stipends for the 17total number of eligible students for that fiscal year, then 18the Board shall prioritize eligible students based on 19demonstrated financial need reported by each educator 20preparation program.21    (g) Funds not distributed in a particular fiscal year by 22an educator preparation program under this Section shall be 23returned to the Board to be used for the subsequent fiscal 24year's stipend program.25    (h) An educator preparation program may not prohibit an 26eligible student from participating in the stipend program or   HB4360- 4 -LRB104 12580 AAS 23145 b1from receiving a stipend from the stipend program. 2    (i) Under the stipend program and subject to available 3appropriations, the Board shall disburse funds to the State 4Board of Education, who shall disburse funds to each school 5district employing an eligible cooperating school counselor to 6distribute to each eligible cooperating school counselor a 7stipend of up to $1,000 per semester for up to 2 consecutive 8semesters per academic year. The school district shall 9distribute stipend funds to an eligible cooperating school 10counselor in one payment.11    (j) An eligible cooperating school counselor who receives 12a stipend must complete State-approved, evidence-based 13training that covers basic responsibilities of a cooperating 14school counselor. The State Board of Education shall develop 15training that meets the criteria of this subsection and that 16is available to cooperating school counselors.17    (k) If there is a surplus appropriated in a fiscal year for 18the stipend program, then the Board shall increase the amount 19disbursed to the State Board of Education to disburse to each 20school district by the same percentage that the surplus bears 21to the amount required to fully fund the total number of 22eligible cooperating school counselors who qualify for the 23stipend program that fiscal year. A school district shall 24increase the stipend amount distributed to each eligible 25cooperating school counselor in proportion to the surplus.26    (l) If the amount appropriated in a fiscal year for the   HB4360- 5 -LRB104 12580 AAS 23145 b1stipend program is insufficient to fully fund stipends for the 2total number of eligible cooperating school counselors for 3that fiscal year, then the Board shall reduce the amount 4disbursed to the State Board of Education to disburse to each 5school district by the same percentage that the deficit bears 6to the amount required to fully fund the total number of 7eligible cooperating school counselors who qualify for the 8stipend program. A school district shall reduce the stipend 9amount distributed to each eligible cooperating school 10counselor in proportion to the deficit.11    (m) Nothing in this Section is intended to preclude an 12educator preparation program from providing an eligible 13cooperating school counselor with additional incentives.14    (n) An eligible cooperating school counselor participating 15in the stipend program may receive professional development 16hours for completing cooperating school counselor training.17    (o) Subject to available appropriations, the Board shall 18issue a report evaluating the impact of the stipend program on 19educator preparation programs, including enrollment and 20completion rates, hiring rates, and retention rates. The Board 21shall issue this report in collaboration with the State Board 22of Education. The Board shall submit this report to the 23General Assembly and Governor on or before June 30 of the 24fiscal year following the third consecutive fiscal year during 25which the stipend program has received funding of at least 26$2,000,000.  HB4360- 6 -LRB104 12580 AAS 23145 b1    (p) The Board shall provide guidance and technical 2assistance to educator preparation programs on the 3administration of the stipend program. 4    (q) The Board shall adopt rules regarding the 5administration of the stipend program, including, but not 6limited to, the allocation of funds for the stipend program. 7    (r) If the stipend program is funded prior to the adoption 8of rules under subsection (q), emergency rules regarding the 9administration of the stipend program may be adopted by the 10Board, subject to the provisions of Section 5-45 of the 11Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.  12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.